Nevada, session 83, SB351.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385A.600 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.600 1. The Department shall make every effort to
obtain the approval necessary from the United States Department of
Education to ensure that the statewide system of accountability for
public schools complies with all requirements for the receipt of
federal money under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act
of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., as amended.
2. The statewide system of accountability applies to all public
schools, regardless of Title I status, and must, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720:
(a) Include a method to, on an annual basis, rate each public
school based upon the performance of the school and based upon
whether each public school meets the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability;
(b) Include a method to implement consequences, rewards and
supports for public schools based upon the ratings;
(c) Include a method to provide grants and other financial
support, to the extent that money is available from legislative
appropriation, to public schools receiving one of the two lowest
ratings of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; and
(d) Establish school achievement targets and performance
targets for public schools and performance targets for specific
groups of pupils, including, without limitation, pupils who are
economically disadvantaged, pupils from major racial and ethnic
groups, pupils with disabilities and pupils who are English learners.
The school achievement targets and performance targets must:
(1) Be based primarily upon the measurement of the progress
and proficiency of pupils on the examinations administered pursuant
to NRS 390.105; and
(2) For high schools, include the rate of graduation and the
rate of attendance.
3. The method used by the statewide system of accountability
to rate each public school must, in incorporating the measurement
of the progress of pupils on the examinations administered
pursuant to NRS 390.105, use a scoring system which places twice
as much weight on the progress in a subject of a pupil who, in an
examination administered in the immediately preceding year,
received a score in that subject that was lower than 75 percent of
the pupils enrolled in the same grade at the same school.
-
*SB351*

– 3 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the statewide system of accountability for public schools
may include a method to:
(a) On an annual basis, rate school districts based upon the
performance of the public schools within the school district and
whether those public schools meet the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability; and
(b) Implement consequences, rewards and supports for school
districts based upon the ratings.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB351*